Washington statutes.
RCW 43.101.170

Training and education obtained at approved existing institutions.

In establishing standards for training and education, the commission may, so far as consistent with the purposes of *RCW 43.101.160, permit required training and education of any criminal justice personnel to be obtained at existing institutions approved for such training by the commission.

[ 1974 ex.s. c 94 s 17.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 43.101.160 was repealed by 1983 c 197 s 55, effective June 30, 1987.